indomorph/hin/num.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+Card +Ord +Num

LEXICON Root
< [ %0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9 | %, ]+ > Number ;
< [ %0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9 | %, ]+ %. [ %0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9 ]+ > Number ;
< [० | १ | २ | ३ | ४ | ५ | ६ | ७ | ८ | ९ ]+ > Number ;
< [० | १ | २ | ३ | ४ | ५ | ६ | ७ | ८ | ९ ]+ %. [० | १ | २ | ३ | ४ | ५ | ६ | ७ | ८ | ९ ]+ > Number ;

LEXICON Number
+Num:0 # ;
